West Virginia, session 2026, HB5672.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 29. EXCISE TAX ON SCHEDULE II DRUGS TO DRUG ABUSE. §11-29-1. Collection of tax for sales of opioid derived Schedule II controlled substances to state pharmacies; proceeds of tax to fund substance abuse and prevention programs. There is hereby imposed an excise tax on pills purchased by or for any licensed pharmacy in this state for all opioid substances and their derivatives, and opioid drugs included in Schedule II, as defined in §60A-2-206 of this code. The excise tax shall be one cent multiplied by the number of overdose deaths in West Virginia published for the most recent year available by the Department of Health's Epidemiology Division. The Department of Health shall provide the most recent years data on or before December 1st of each year and the Tax Commission shall determine the amount of tax and notify each pharmacy in the state the appropriate amount of tax to assess of one cent per state drug overdose death on each 100 pills sold, effective each January 1st of each year. The tax is imposed on every pharmaceutical manufacturer or distributor selling Schedule II drugs to licensed pharmacies in this state. The pharmacies licensed and doing business in the State of West Virginia shall collect and remit the tax to the Tax Commissioner. No pharmaceutical manufacturer, distributor or pharmacy may pass on as a cost or otherwise collect this excise tax from the patient. Each pharmacy shall periodically remit the tax collected to the Tax Commissioner pursuant to legislative or interpretative rules promulgated for the collection of this tax by the commissioner, pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, to be deposited by the commissioner upon collection into the Ryan Brown Addiction Prevention and Recovery Fund established pursuant to §16-53-2 of this code.